District of Columbia statutes.
1-606.09

Enforcement of order.

If the Office determines that the respondent has not complied with an order within 30 calendar days of service of the order, the Office shall certify the matter to the General Counsel and any agency that may be appropriate for enforcement.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 608
as added May 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-127, § 2(e), 37 DCR 2093

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-606.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-606.9.